Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202669-1206
License; renewal; fee; bond.

Each licensee on or before December 1 may make application to the secretary for renewal of its license. The application shall be on the form prescribed by the secretary and shall be accompanied by a fee of one hundred dollars, together with a bond as in the case of an original application. A separate application shall be made for each office. The secretary shall remit the fees received pursuant to this section to the State Treasurer for credit to the Secretary of State Cash Fund.

Laws 1967, c. 377, § 6, p. 1182;

Laws 1982, LB 928, § 51;

Laws 2020, LB910, § 30.